District of Columbia statutes.
5-331.09

Identification of MPD personnel policing First Amendment assemblies.

The MPD shall implement a method for enhancing the visibility to the public of the name or badge number of officers policing a First Amendment assembly by modifying the manner in which those officers’ names or badge numbers are affixed to the officers’ uniforms or helmets. The MPD shall ensure that all uniformed officers assigned to police First Amendment assemblies are equipped with the enhanced identification and may be identified even if wearing riot gear.

History

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 109, 52 DCR 2296